District of Columbia statutes.
50-903

Organization.

There is hereby established in the DMV offices and divisions as follows:

(1)

The Office of the Director, with subordinate staff offices as are required to carry out overall management responsibility for the office;

(2)

Division of Adjudication, with subordinate staff offices as required, to coordinate and manage the functions as follows:

(A)

Traffic adjudication hearings;

(B)

Traffic adjudication processing; and

(C)

Public space adjudication;

(3)

Customer Services Division, with such subordinate staff offices as are required, to coordinate and manage the following functions for the District:

(A)

Vehicle inspection;

(B)

Vehicle registration; and

(C)

Driver testing, including medical reviews and insurance compliance; and

(4)

Support Services Division, with such subordinate staff offices as are required to coordinate and manage the procurement, financial, technology and administrative functions for the Department of Motor Vehicles, and management of the personal property inventory for the Department of Motor Vehicles.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1824, 45 DCR 7193
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 151(a), 47 DCR 520
1981 Ed., § 40-153.
D.C. Law 13-91 validated a previously made technical amendment in subsec. (2).
For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 50-901.
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 1A, see notes following § 50-901.
Application of D.C. Law 12-175: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-901.